Utah statutes.
7-24-203.   Disclosure form for title loans.

(1)  In accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, the department shall adopt a disclosure form for title loans that complies with this section.

(2)  The department shall specify by rule:

(a)  the information to be provided in the disclosure form including:

(i)  the costs of obtaining a title loan;

(ii)  the consequences of defaulting on a title loan;

(iii)  generally available alternatives to a title loan; and

(iv)  methods of obtaining credit counseling or other financial advice;

(b)  the type size of the disclosure form; and

(c)  the manner in which a title lender shall conspicuously provide the disclosure form to a person seeking a title loan.

